District of Columbia statutes.
2-272.02

Professional staff.

(a)

The Office shall be headed by an Executive Director who shall have demonstrated knowledge, training, or experience in the following areas:

(1)

Infrastructure development;

(2)

Capital markets and finance, including municipal finance;

(3)

Public-sector planning; and

(4)

Procurement.

(b)

The Executive Director and Office staff shall be subject to the Code of Conduct, as defined in § 1-1161.01.

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-228, § 103, 62 DCR 261